Louisiana, session 2026, HB347.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:4.9(B) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§4.9. Low-risk foods; preparation in home for public consumption
* * *
B. This Section shall does not apply to any preparer of low-risk foods made
at a home for sale, whose gross annual sales equal thirty thousand one hundred
thousand dollars or more.
* * *